Montana, session 2025, HB929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Prescriptive authority license endorsement -- formulary --
requirements -- rulemaking. (1) A chiropractor may apply to the board for a license endorsement for
prescriptive authority. The board may assess a fee for a prescriptive authority license endorsement application.
(2) A chiropractor who successfully obtains a license endorsement for prescriptive authority may
prescribe, obtain, and administer only the following noncontrolled, nonscheduled formulary drugs for diagnostic
and therapeutic use for musculoskeletal treatment and pain:
(a) over-the-counter analgesics;
(b) prescription nonsteroidal noninflammatory drugs;
(c) muscle relaxants;
(d) topical analgesics and anti-inflammatories;
(e) topical cortical steroids; and
(f) topical and oral cortical steroids.
(3) The board shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) the procedures for chiropractors to apply for a license endorsement;
(b) the educational qualifications required for a license endorsement, including:
(i) the number of hours of initial and ongoing pharmacology education; and
(ii) approved pharmacology continuing education programs;
(c) standard protocols for prescribing prescription drugs that chiropractors with a license
endorsement shall follow; and
(d) other requirements deemed reasonably necessary by the board to implement a prescriptive
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 929

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1247.1
authority license endorsement.
(4) The board may adopt rules to allow the prescribing of new noncontrolled and nonscheduled
drugs approved by the United States food and drug administration that fit within the formulary in subsection (2).
(5) A chiropractor licensed under this chapter is not required to apply for the licensing
endorsement available under this section. A chiropractor who has not been approved by the board for a
prescriptive authority license endorsement may not promote, advertise, or imply that the chiropractor has the
authority described in subsection (2).

Section 2. Section 37-12-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-12-101. Definitions -- practice of chiropractic. Unless the context requires otherwise, in this
chapter, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Board" means the board of chiropractors provided for in 2-15-1737.
(2) "Department" means the department of labor and industry provided for in Title 2, chapter 15,
part 17.
(3) (a) "Chiropractic" is the system of specific adjustment or manipulation of the articulations and
tissues of the body, particularly of the spinal column, for the correction of nerve interference and includes the
use of recognized diagnostic and treatment methods as taught in chiropractic colleges but does not include
surgery or the prescription or use of drugs means the science, art, and philosophy of things natural and the
science of locating and removing interference with the transmissions or expression of nerve forces in the
human body by the correction of misalignments or subluxations of the articulations and adjacent structures,
especially those of the vertebral column and pelvis, for the purpose of restoring and maintaining health or for
treatment of human disease primarily by adjustment and manipulation of the human structure. The term
includes the prescription and administration of all natural agents in all forms to assist in the healing act, such as
food, water, heat, light, cold, electricity, mechanical appliances, herbs, nutritional supplements, homeopathic
remedies, and any necessary diagnostic procedure.
(b) The term does not include invasive procedures, surgery, or the prescription or use of controlled
or dangerous drugs, except as provided in [section 1]."

- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 929

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1247.1
Section 3. Section 37-12-104, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-12-104. Rights and limitations governing practice. (1) Chiropractors (a) Individuals licensed
under this chapter shall have the right to practice that the science defined as chiropractic under 37-12-101 in
accordance with the method, thought, and practice of chiropractors, and they shall be are permitted to use the
prefix "Dr." or "Doctor" as a title but shall may not in any way imply that they the individuals are medical doctors,
osteopaths, or surgeons. They
(b) Except as provided in subsection (2), a chiropractor shall may not prescribe for or administer to
any person any medicine or drugs or practice medicine or surgery or osteopathy, except that the a chiropractor
is permitted to use of antiseptics for purposes of sanitation and hygiene and to prevent infection and contagion
shall be permitted.
(2) A chiropractor who successfully obtains a license endorsement for prescriptive authority from
the board may prescribe for therapeutic and diagnostic purposes as authorized under [section 1].
(2)(3) Licensed chiropractors may diagnose, palpate, and treat the human body by the application of
manipulative, manual, mechanical, and dietetic methods, including chiropractic physiotherapy, the use of
supportive appliances, analytical instruments, and diagnostic x-ray in accordance with guidelines promulgated
or approved by state or federal health regulatory agencies."

Section 4. Section 37-12-201, MCA, is amended to read:
"37-12-201. Organization of board -- powers and duties. The board shall:
(1) elect annually a president, vice president, and secretary-treasurer from its membership;
(2) administer oaths, take affidavits, summon witnesses, and take testimony as to matters coming
within the scope of the board;
(3) make a schedule of minimum educational requirements that are without prejudice, partiality, or
discrimination as to the different schools of chiropractic;
(4) adopt rules necessary for the implementation, administration, continuation, and enforcement of
this chapter. The rules must address but are not limited to license applications, the display of licenses, and the
registration of interns and preceptors, and the issuing of prescriptive authority license endorsements.
(5) make determinations of the qualifications of applicants under this chapter; and
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 929

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 LC 1247.1
(6) certify that a chiropractor who meets the standards that the board by rule adopts is a qualified
evaluator for purposes of 39-71-711."

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 37, chapter 12, part 3, and the provisions of Title 37, chapter 12, part 3, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 929